dev/determiner/determiner.ne.dix
  <!-- ती; ती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ती__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यत्रो; त्यत्रो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यत्रो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कसैं; कसैं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कसैं__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तै; तै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- क्वै; क्वै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="क्वै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उनी; उनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उनी__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उत्तिकै; उत्तिकै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उत्तिकै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कत्रो; कत्र; 3 -->
    <pardef n="कत्र/ो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="f"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा-कत्रा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यति; त्यति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यति__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यत्ति; त्यत्ति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यत्ति__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यती; यती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यती__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यतै; यतै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यतै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जो; जो; 3 -->
    <pardef n="जो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>सुकै</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>सुकै</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जहीं; जहीं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जहीं__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जे; जे; 3 -->
    <pardef n="जे__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-जति</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>सुकै</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उक्त; उक्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उक्त__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जुन-जुन; जुन-जुन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जुन-जुन__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यिनि; यिनि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यिनि__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उत्ति; उत्ति; 2 -->
    <pardef n="उत्ति__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तस्तै; तस्तै; 2 -->
    <pardef n="तस्तै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यति; यति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यति__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- किन; किन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="किन__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ऊस; ऊस; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ऊस__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- क्या; क्या; 1 -->
    <pardef n="क्या__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यत्रो; यत्रो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यत्रो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यही; यही; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यही__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तेही; तेही; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तेही__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उहाँ; उहाँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उहाँ__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ऊनी; ऊनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ऊनी__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उहि; उहि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उहि__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उता; उता; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उता__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उति; उति; 3 -->
    <pardef n="उति__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उति</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-उति</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तीन; तीन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तीन__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कस; कस; 2 -->
    <pardef n="कस__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>कस</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कुन; कुन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कुन__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तेस्तै; तेस्तै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तेस्तै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ती"><i>ती</i><par n="ती__det"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यत्रो"><i>त्यत्रो</i><par n="त्यत्रो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कसैं"><i>कसैं</i><par n="कसैं__det"/></e>
    <e lm="तै"><i>तै</i><par n="तै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="क्वै"><i>क्वै</i><par n="क्वै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उनी"><i>उनी</i><par n="उनी__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उत्तिकै"><i>उत्तिकै</i><par n="उत्तिकै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कत्रो"><i>कत्र</i><par n="कत्र/ो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यति"><i>त्यति</i><par n="त्यति__det"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यत्ति"><i>त्यत्ति</i><par n="त्यत्ति__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यती"><i>यती</i><par n="यती__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यतै"><i>यतै</i><par n="यतै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जो"><i>जो</i><par n="जो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जहीं"><i>जहीं</i><par n="जहीं__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जे"><i>जे</i><par n="जे__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उक्त"><i>उक्त</i><par n="उक्त__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जुन-जुन"><i>जुन-जुन</i><par n="जुन-जुन__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यिनि"><i>यिनि</i><par n="यिनि__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उत्ति"><i>उत्ति</i><par n="उत्ति__det"/></e>
    <e lm="तस्तै"><i>तस्तै</i><par n="तस्तै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यति"><i>यति</i><par n="यति__det"/></e>
    <e lm="किन"><i>किन</i><par n="किन__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ऊस"><i>ऊस</i><par n="ऊस__det"/></e>
    <e lm="क्या"><i>क्या</i><par n="क्या__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यत्रो"><i>यत्रो</i><par n="यत्रो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यही"><i>यही</i><par n="यही__det"/></e>
    <e lm="तेही"><i>तेही</i><par n="तेही__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उहाँ"><i>उहाँ</i><par n="उहाँ__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ऊनी"><i>ऊनी</i><par n="ऊनी__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उहि"><i>उहि</i><par n="उहि__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उता"><i>उता</i><par n="उता__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उति"><i>उति</i><par n="उति__det"/></e>
    <e lm="तीन"><i>तीन</i><par n="तीन__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कस"><i>कस</i><par n="कस__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कुन"><i>कुन</i><par n="कुन__det"/></e>
    <e lm="तेस्तै"><i>तेस्तै</i><par n="तेस्तै__det"/></e>
